Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.230

Periodic general inspection—Emergency rules.

(1) The department shall, in addition to any inspections conducted pursuant to complaints filed pursuant to RCW 18.51.190, conduct a periodic general inspection of each nursing home in the state without providing advance notice of such inspection. Such inspections must conform to the federal standards for surveys under 42 C.F.R. Part 488, Subpart E.

(2) If a pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency prevents the department from completing inspections according to the timeline in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall adopt rules to reestablish inspection timelines based on the length of time since the last complete inspection, compliance history of each facility, immediate health or safety concerns, and centers for medicare and medicaid services requirements.

(a) Rules adopted under this subsection (2) are effective until the termination of the pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency or until the department determines that all facility inspections are occurring according to time frames established in subsection (1) of this section, whichever occurs later. Once the department determines a rule adopted under this subsection (2) is no longer necessary, it must repeal the rule under RCW 34.05.353.

(b) Within 12 months of the termination of the pandemic, natural disaster, or other declared state of emergency, the department shall conduct a review of inspection compliance with subsection (1) of this section and provide the legislature with a report.

[ 2021 c 203 s 5; 2020 c 263 s 2; 1981 2nd ex.s. c 11 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Retroactive application—2021 c 203: See notes following RCW 43.43.832.